South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3841.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Assessment rate for decedent's estate SECTION 1.    Section 12-43-220(c) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (9) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when an owner receiving the special assessment rate pursuant to this item (c) dies, the property shall continue to receive the special assessment rate until the decedent's estate is closed, upon the recording of a deed or deed of distribution out of the estate, or after December thirty-first of the year following the date of death, whichever occurs first. This subitem does not apply if the property is rented for more than seventy-two days in or following the calendar year of the decedent's death or if a change of use occurs. Exemptions for decedents estate SECTION 2.    Article 3, Chapter 37, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-37-460.    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when an owner of real property dies, the property shall continue to receive any property tax exemption it was receiving at the time of death until the decedent's estate is closed, upon the recording of a deed or deed of distribution out of the estate, or after December thirty-first of the year following the date of death, whichever occurs first. This section does not apply if the property becomes ineligible for the exemption for a reason other than the death. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and applies to property tax years beginning after 2025. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________